Wisconsin, session 2025, SB641.
do enact as follows:SB641,14Section 1. 101.02 (7r) (f) of the statutes is repealed.SB641,25Section 2. 101.02 (7r) (h) of the statutes is created to read:SB641,2,31101.02 (7r) (h) Notwithstanding par. (a), a county, city, village, or town may 2enact and enforce an ordinance that relates to fire detection, prevention, and 3suppression in a public building that contains a dwelling, as defined in s. 101.61 (1).SB641,2,44